Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-511.01
Nonprofit organization; conduct lottery or raffle with winners determined by racing objects; conditions.

(1) A qualifying nonprofit organization may conduct a lottery or raffle in which the winners are to be determined by a race utilizing inanimate, buoyant objects floated along a river, canal, or other waterway. The objects shall each bear a number or other unique identifying mark which corresponds to sequentially numbered tickets which are sold to participants in the lottery or raffle. A qualifying nonprofit organization utilizing this method of winner determination shall comply with all other requirements of the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

(2) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the conduct of a lottery or raffle utilizing the method of winner determination provided by this section.

Laws 2000, LB 1086, § 22.